District of Columbia statutes.
28-5203

Application.

Except for random and uniform weight packages that clearly state the unit, each person who sells, offers, or displays for sale a consumer commodity at retail shall provide the unit price information in the manner prescribed in this chapter.

History

Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-282, § 2(c), 60 DCR 2132